Tennessee, session 114, HB1978.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-6-318(c)(2), is amended by
adding the following sentence at the end of the subdivision:
The commissioner may issue the certificate in paper or electronic medium.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1978
011326
- 1 -